Maine, session 132, LD792.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to the Christine B. Foundation to support a research
project to evaluate the impact of access to medically tailored groceries and dietician
counseling on cancer patients and their families.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $300,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $300,000 $0